apertium-br-fr/apertium-br-fr.fr.metadix
    <pardef n="fo/u__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>u<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>us</l>
          <r>u<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lle</l>
          <r>u<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lles</l>
          <r>u<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="suée__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

 
  </pardefs>

    <e lm="suée"><i>suée</i><par n="suée__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fou"><i>fo</i><par n="fo/u__n"/></e>
